Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.050

Park and recreation board—Removal of members—Vacancies.

Any appointed county park and recreation board member may be removed by a majority vote of the board of county commissioners either for cause or upon the joint written recommendation of five members of the county park and recreation board. Vacancies on the county park and recreation board shall be filled by appointment, made by the board of county commissioners for the unexpired portions of the terms vacated.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.68.050. Prior: 1949 c 94 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3991-18.]